Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.102

Education requirements—Secretary to define.

All education requirements established as defined by the secretary under RCW 18.205.100 credited by an approved education program for participants in the apprenticeship program for substance use disorder professionals must meet or exceed competency requirements established by the secretary.

[ 2021 c 165 s 4.]

NOTES:

Rules—2021 c 165: See note following RCW 18.205.095.